North Dakota statutes. TITLE 52 Social Security
CHAPTER 52-01 Definitions and General Provisions
52-01-02.
Employing unit to keep records — Reports of employing unit — Public inspection prohibited — Exception — Penalty.

All records, including electronic records as defined in section 9-16-01, of the employers doing business in this state showing or reflecting in any way upon the amount of wage expenditure by or upon payments for services performed for those employers are always open for inspection by employees of job service North Dakota who are assigned responsibility to do so for the purpose of ascertaining the correctness of the reports, wage expenditures, the number of employees, and any other information necessary for the agency to administer this title. An employer who refuses to submit the employer’s records, including electronic records as defined in section 9-16-01, for inspection by an identified and assigned employee of job service North Dakota is subject to a civil penalty of five hundred dollars for each offense. The agency shall collect the penalty by civil action in the name of the state and shall deposit any penalty collected under this section to the credit of the fund established by section 52-04-22. Information obtained pursuant to this section may not be published or be open to public inspection, other than to public employees in the performance of their public duties, in any manner revealing the employing unit’s identity, but any claimant or the claimant’s legal representative at a hearing before a hearing officer or the agency must be supplied with information from such records to the extent necessary for the proper presentation of the appeal.

Source:

S.L. 1937, ch. 232, § 11, subs. f; R.C. 1943, § 52-0102; S.L. 1945, ch. 284, § 1; 1957 Supp., § 52-0102; S.L. 1983, ch. 536, § 1; 1989, ch. 69, § 56; 2003, ch. 440, § 2.

52-01-03.
Disclosure of information. [Effective through August 31, 2022]

Except as otherwise provided in this section, information obtained from any employing unit or individual pursuant to the administration of the North Dakota unemployment compensation law and determinations as to the benefit rights of any individual must be held confidential and may not be disclosed or be open to public inspection in any manner revealing the individual’s or employing unit’s identity. Any claimant or claimant’s legal representative must be supplied with information from the records of the unemployment insurance division, to the extent necessary for the proper presentation of the claimant’s claim in any proceeding under the North Dakota unemployment compensation law with respect to the claim.

Subject to restrictions as the bureau by rule may prescribe, the information may be made available to any agency of this or any other state, or any federal agency, charged with the administration of any unemployment compensation law or the maintenance of a system of public employment offices, or the bureau of internal revenue of the United States department of the treasury, and information obtained in connection with the administration of the employment service may be made available to persons or agencies for purposes appropriate to the operation of a public employment service. Upon a request, the bureau shall furnish to any agency of the United States charged with the administration of public works or assistance through public employment, and may furnish to any state agency similarly charged, the name, address, ordinary occupation, and employment status of each recipient of benefits and the recipient’s rights to further benefits under the North Dakota unemployment compensation law. The bureau may request the comptroller of the currency of the United States to cause an examination of the correctness of any return or report of any national banking association, rendered pursuant to the North Dakota unemployment compensation law, and in connection with the request, may transmit any report or return to the comptroller of the currency of the United States as provided in subsection c of section 3305 of the federal Internal Revenue Code. The bureau shall request and exchange information for purposes of income and eligibility verification to meet the requirements of section 1137 of the Social Security Act. Job service North Dakota may enter into memoranda of understanding with the United States census bureau to furnish unemployment insurance data to the census bureau and for sharing of information with job service North Dakota.

Job service North Dakota may provide workforce safety and insurance, the labor commissioner, the driver’s license division of the department of transportation, the department of human services, the department of commerce, the state tax commissioner, and the information technology department for purposes of the statewide longitudinal data system with information obtained pursuant to the administration of the unemployment insurance program, and may enter into interagency agreements with those entities for the exchange of information that will enhance the administration of the unemployment insurance program. Any information furnished pursuant to this subsection or pursuant to interagency agreements authorized by this subsection is to be used only for governmental purposes.

The bureau may provide any state agency or a private entity with the names and addresses of employing units for the purpose of jointly publishing or distributing publications or other information as provided in section 54-06-04.3. Any information so provided may only be used for the purpose of jointly publishing or distributing publications or other information as provided in section 54-06-04.3.

Whenever the bureau obtains information on the activities of a contractor doing business in this state of which officials of the secretary of state, workforce safety and insurance, or the state tax commissioner may be unaware and that may be relevant to duties of those officials, the bureau shall provide any relevant information to those officials for the purpose of administering their duties.

The bureau shall request and exchange information as required of it under federal law with any specified governmental agencies. Any information so provided may be used only for the purpose of administering the duties of such governmental agencies.

The bureau shall enter into a data sharing agreement with the attorney general for the purpose of monitoring individuals who are required to register as sexual offenders or offenders against children. Under such agreement, the bureau may furnish unemployment insurance employee or claimant contact information and the names and addresses of the employers for whom the employee or claimant has worked.

Job service North Dakota may enter an interagency agreement with the department of commerce for the sharing of information obtained pursuant to the administration of the unemployment insurance program, limited to wage and employment number records of employers identified by the department of commerce as having received North Dakota state economic development assistance. Information provided by job service North Dakota under an agreement may be used only for purposes of evaluation by the department of commerce of the compliance with statutory or contractual performance standards established for employers who received North Dakota state economic development assistance. Information received by the department of commerce under this subsection shall remain confidential and may not be divulged except in an aggregate format that does not permit the identification of information of any individual or employer. Any information furnished pursuant to this subsection or pursuant to interagency agreements authorized by this subsection is to be used for governmental purposes.

Source:

S.L. 1941, ch. 261, § 10; R.C. 1943, § 52-0103; S.L. 1945, ch. 284, § 1; 1957 Supp., § 52-0103; S.L. 1969, ch. 516, § 1; 1983, ch. 82, § 107; 1983, ch. 536, § 2; 1985, ch. 544, § 2; 1989, ch. 509, § 2; 1989, ch. 598, § 1; 1991, ch. 95, § 34; 1991, ch. 568, § 2; 1995, ch. 479, § 1; 2001, ch. 488, § 22; 2003, ch. 441, § 1; 2003, ch. 561, § 3; 2005, ch. 452, § 1; 2007, ch. 386, § 2; 2011, ch. 127, § 5; 2013, ch. 391, § 1; 2015, ch. 354, § 1, effective August 1, 2015.

Effective Date.

The 2015 amendment of this section by section 1 of chapter 354, S.L. 2015 became effective August 1, 2015.

The 2013 amendment of this section by section 1 of chapter 391, S.L. 2013 became effective August 1, 2013.

The 2011 amendment of this section by section 5 of chapter 127, S.L. 2011 became effective August 1, 2011.

The 2007 amendment of this section by section 2 of chapter 386, S.L. 2007
became effective August 1, 2007.

Note.

For above referenced section 3305(c) of the Internal Revenue Code of 1954, see
26 USCS § 3305(c).

52-01-03.
Disclosure of information. [Effective September 1, 2022]

Except as otherwise provided in this section, information obtained from any employing unit or individual pursuant to the administration of the North Dakota unemployment compensation law and determinations as to the benefit rights of any individual must be held confidential and may not be disclosed or be open to public inspection in any manner revealing the individual’s or employing unit’s identity. Any claimant or claimant’s legal representative must be supplied with information from the records of the unemployment insurance division, to the extent necessary for the proper presentation of the claimant’s claim in any proceeding under the North Dakota unemployment compensation law with respect to the claim.

Subject to restrictions as the bureau by rule may prescribe, the information may be made available to any agency of this or any other state, or any federal agency, charged with the administration of any unemployment compensation law or the maintenance of a system of public employment offices, or the bureau of internal revenue of the United States department of the treasury, and information obtained in connection with the administration of the employment service may be made available to persons or agencies for purposes appropriate to the operation of a public employment service. Upon a request, the bureau shall furnish to any agency of the United States charged with the administration of public works or assistance through public employment, and may furnish to any state agency similarly charged, the name, address, ordinary occupation, and employment status of each recipient of benefits and the recipient’s rights to further benefits under the North Dakota unemployment compensation law. The bureau may request the comptroller of the currency of the United States to cause an examination of the correctness of any return or report of any national banking association, rendered pursuant to the North Dakota unemployment compensation law, and in connection with the request, may transmit any report or return to the comptroller of the currency of the United States as provided in subsection c of section 3305 of the federal Internal Revenue Code. The bureau shall request and exchange information for purposes of income and eligibility verification to meet the requirements of section 1137 of the Social Security Act. Job service North Dakota may enter into memoranda of understanding with the United States census bureau to furnish unemployment insurance data to the census bureau and for sharing of information with job service North Dakota.

Job service North Dakota may provide workforce safety and insurance, the labor commissioner, the driver’s license division of the department of transportation, the department of health and human services, the department of commerce, the state tax commissioner, and the information technology department for purposes of the statewide longitudinal data system with information obtained pursuant to the administration of the unemployment insurance program, and may enter into interagency agreements with those entities for the exchange of information that will enhance the administration of the unemployment insurance program. Any information furnished pursuant to this subsection or pursuant to interagency agreements authorized by this subsection is to be used only for governmental purposes.

The bureau may provide any state agency or a private entity with the names and addresses of employing units for the purpose of jointly publishing or distributing publications or other information as provided in section 54-06-04.3. Any information so provided may only be used for the purpose of jointly publishing or distributing publications or other information as provided in section 54-06-04.3.

Whenever the bureau obtains information on the activities of a contractor doing business in this state of which officials of the secretary of state, workforce safety and insurance, or the state tax commissioner may be unaware and that may be relevant to duties of those officials, the bureau shall provide any relevant information to those officials for the purpose of administering their duties.

The bureau shall request and exchange information as required of it under federal law with any specified governmental agencies. Any information so provided may be used only for the purpose of administering the duties of such governmental agencies.

The bureau shall enter into a data sharing agreement with the attorney general for the purpose of monitoring individuals who are required to register as sexual offenders or offenders against children. Under such agreement, the bureau may furnish unemployment insurance employee or claimant contact information and the names and addresses of the employers for whom the employee or claimant has worked.

Job service North Dakota may enter an interagency agreement with the department of commerce for the sharing of information obtained pursuant to the administration of the unemployment insurance program, limited to wage and employment number records of employers identified by the department of commerce as having received North Dakota state economic development assistance. Information provided by job service North Dakota under an agreement may be used only for purposes of evaluation by the department of commerce of the compliance with statutory or contractual performance standards established for employers who received North Dakota state economic development assistance. Information received by the department of commerce under this subsection shall remain confidential and may not be divulged except in an aggregate format that does not permit the identification of information of any individual or employer. Any information furnished pursuant to this subsection or pursuant to interagency agreements authorized by this subsection is to be used for governmental purposes.

Source:

S.L. 1941, ch. 261, § 10; R.C. 1943, § 52-0103; S.L. 1945, ch. 284, § 1; 1957 Supp., § 52-0103; S.L. 1969, ch. 516, § 1; 1983, ch. 82, § 107; 1983, ch. 536, § 2; 1985, ch. 544, § 2; 1989, ch. 509, § 2; 1989, ch. 598, § 1; 1991, ch. 95, § 34; 1991, ch. 568, § 2; 1995, ch. 479, § 1; 2001, ch. 488, § 22; 2003, ch. 441, § 1; 2003, ch. 561, § 3; 2005, ch. 452, § 1; 2007, ch. 386, § 2; 2011, ch. 127, § 5; 2013, ch. 391, § 1; 2015, ch. 354, § 1, effective August 1, 2015; 2021, ch. 352, § 482, effective September 1, 2022.

52-01-04.
Penalty for use of list of names for political purposes.

Any person who has obtained any list of applicants for work, claimants, or recipients of benefits from the bureau under any pretext, who uses or permits the use of such list for any political purpose, is guilty of a class B misdemeanor.

Source:

S.L. 1937, ch. 232, § 17, subs. a; 1941, ch. 261, § 9, subs. d; R.C. 1943, § 52-0104; S.L. 1945, ch. 284, § 1; 1957 Supp., § 52-0104; S.L. 1965, ch. 333, § 3; 1971, ch. 476, § 1; 1975, ch. 106, § 564.

52-01-05.
Declaration of public policy.

Involuntary unemployment creates a hardship on the unemployed worker and the unemployed worker’s family and leads to a state of economic insecurity. Relief from problems of involuntary unemployment imposes a statewide burden of serious consequence to the people of the state of North Dakota which can best be met by unemployment insurance for the working person who becomes unemployed through no personal fault. The legislative assembly, therefore, declares that the public good and general welfare of the citizens of the state requires that for laboring people genuinely attached to the labor market there be a systematic and compulsory setting aside of financial reserves to be used as compensation for loss of wages during periods when they become unemployed through no fault of their own.

Source:

S.L. 1963, ch. 332, § 1.

Note.

Former section 52-01-05 (S.L. 1945, ch. 284, § 1) was repealed by omission from the North Dakota Century Code. Section 1 of ch. 332, S.L. 1963 was assigned this section number because the subject and language are nearly identical.

52-01-06.
Saving clause.

The legislative assembly reserves the right to amend or repeal all or any part of the North Dakota unemployment compensation law at any time and there is no vested private right of any kind against such amendment or repeal. All the rights, privileges, or immunities conferred by the North Dakota unemployment compensation law or by acts done pursuant thereto exist subject to the power of the legislative assembly to amend or repeal the North Dakota unemployment compensation law at any time.

Source:

S.L. 1945, ch. 284, § 1; R.C. 1943, 1957 Supp., § 52-0106.

Collateral References.

Vested right of applicant for unemployment compensation in mode and manner of computing benefits in effect at time of his discharge or loss of employment, 20 A.L.R.2d 963.

52-01-07.
Short title.

Chapters 52-01 through 52-07.1 must be known and may be cited as the “North Dakota unemployment compensation law”. Any reference within chapters 52-01, 52-02, 52-03, 52-04, 52-05, and 52-06 by the use of words “this title” are synonymous with and refer only to the North Dakota unemployment compensation law.

Source:

S.L. 1945, ch. 284, § 1; R.C. 1943, 1957 Supp., § 52-0107; S.L. 1971, ch. 476, § 2; 1973, ch. 391, § 17.